District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.30

Injunctions; unlawful practices.

(a)

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia may bring an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in the name of the District of Columbia to enjoin the unlawful practice of any occupation or profession or any other action which is grounds for the imposition of a criminal penalty or disciplinary action under this subchapter.

(b)

Remedies under this section are in addition to criminal prosecution or any disciplinary action by a board.

(c)

In any proceeding under this section, it shall not be necessary to prove that any person is personally injured by the action or actions alleged.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(l)(10), 52 DCR 2638

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.30.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.